Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.300

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee—Determination of probable cause—Notice—Opportunity for hearing.

In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or causes for a teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee, holding a position as such with the school district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", to be discharged or otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status, such employee shall be notified in writing of that decision, which notification shall specify the probable cause or causes for such action. Such determinations of probable cause for certificated employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by the superintendent. Such notices shall be served upon that employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the president, chair of the board or secretary of the board of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be granted opportunity for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to determine whether or not there is sufficient cause or causes for his or her discharge or other adverse action against his or her contract status.

In the event any such notice or opportunity for hearing is not timely given, or in the event cause for discharge or other adverse action is not established by a preponderance of the evidence at the hearing, such employee shall not be discharged or otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status for the causes stated in the original notice for the duration of his or her contract.

If such employee does not request a hearing as provided herein, such employee may be discharged or otherwise adversely affected as provided in the notice served upon the employee.

Transfer to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230 or 28A.405.245 shall not be construed as a discharge or other adverse action against contract status for the purposes of this section.

[ 2010 c 235 s 305; 1990 c 33 s 395; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 2; 1973 c 49 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.450. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.450, 28.58.450.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Savings—Severability-1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.

Minimum criteria for the evaluation of certificated employees—Four-level rating evaluation system—Procedures—Steering committee—Implementation—Reports—Comprehensive performance evaluation: RCW 28A.405.100.

Transfer of administrator to subordinate certificated position—Procedure: RCW 28A.405.230.